Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-6106
Long-Term Care Savings Plan Act; termination; participant; entitled to account balance.

The Long-Term Care Savings Plan Act terminates on January 1, 2018. Any participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan on the termination date shall be entitled to receive the full balance of his or her account on such date.

Laws 2016, LB756, § 4.
January 1, 2018